Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB811.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Pennsylvania Small Business Innovation Research Grant and Small Business Technology Transfer Matching Funds Program Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Business." A for-profit business that is headquartered in this Commonwealth and participates in either the Federal SBIR or STTR program."Department." The Department of Community and Economic Development of the Commonwealth.<--1234567891011121314151617 "Program." The Pennsylvania SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program established under section 3."SBIR." The Federal Small Business Innovation Research Program created under 15 U.S.C. § 638 (relating to research and development)."STTR." Small Business Technology Transfer Program created under 15 U.S.C. § 638.Section 3. Establishment and purpose of program.The Pennsylvania SBIR/STTR Matching Funds Program is established and shall be administered by the department. The IN ORDER TO FOSTER JOB CREATION AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT IN THIS COMMONWEALTH BY SUPPORTING SMALL BUSINESS FORMATION AND GROWTH, THE department may provide a grant to an eligible business in an amount that matches money received under an SBIR or STTR Phase I award from the Small Business Administration. The department shall encourage business participation for Phase II awards.Section 4. Eligibility.To be eligible for a grant under this act, a business must:(1) Have at least one of the business' principal places of business located in this Commonwealth.(2) Have received an SBIR or STTR Phase I award from the Small Business Administration in response to a specific Federal solicitation. To receive a full grant award, the business must have submitted a final Phase I report, demonstrated that the Small Business Administration has interest in the Phase II project proposal and submitted a Phase II project proposal to the Small Business Administration.(3) Satisfy Federal SBIR or STTR requirements.(4) Have not received nor shall receive concurrent 20250SB0811PN0936 - 2 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 funding support from other sources THE COMMONWEALTH that duplicates the purpose of this act.(5) Certify that at least 51% of the research described in the Federal SBIR or STTR Phase II project proposal will be conducted in this Commonwealth and that the business will remain based in this Commonwealth for the duration of the SBIR or STTR Phase II project.(6) Demonstrate the business' ability to conduct research in the SBIR or STTR Phase II project proposal.Section 5. Grant awards.(a) Grant.--The department may award a grant to match the money received by a business through an SBIR or STTR Phase I proposal up to a maximum of $50,000. Seventy-five percent of the total grant shall be remitted to the business upon receipt of the SBIR or STTR Phase I award. Twenty-five percent of the total grant award shall be remitted to the business upon submission of the Phase II application to the Small Business Administration by the business and acceptance of the Phase I report by the Small Business Administration. FUNDING MAY BE USED FOR TECHNICAL AND BUSINESS ASSISTANCE ACTIVITIES.(b) Limitations.--A business may:(1) Receive only one grant per year.(2) Receive only one grant under this act with respect to each Federal proposal submission.(3) Only receive a maximum of five awards under the program.Section 6. Application.The department shall develop an application process for the program and publish the application process on the department's publicly accessible Internet website. The application shall 20250SB0811PN0936 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 include:(1) The name of the business.(2) The form of business organization under which the business operates.(3) The name or address of the principal or management of the business.(4) The Small Business Administration's acknowledgment of receipt of the Phase I report and Phase II proposal.(5) Any additional information the department deems necessary to evaluate the application.Section 7. Funding.The General Assembly shall appropriate money to the department for the administration and distribution of grants under this act.Section 8. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary to implement the program.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0811PN0936 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819